Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-568
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing; prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or other conveyance, firearm, bow and arrow, projectile, device, radio, an electronic device, or other equipment in the commission of any of the acts prohibited under section 37-564 or 37-567.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 288.